Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-303
Herd laws; actions; proof of ownership.

In any indictment or complaint under sections 54-301 to 54-310, the description of any kind or class of neat cattle shall be deemed sufficient if described as cattle; and the proof of brand shall be deemed to be prima facie evidence of ownership of such stock.

Laws 1879, § 3, p. 68;

R.S.1913, § 98;

C.S.1922, § 106;

C.S.1929, § 54-303;

R.S.1943, § 54-303.